Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 5
SCENIC TRAILS

12-3-110. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Scenic Trails Act."

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 1.)

12-3-111. Legislative purpose.

In order to provide for the increasing outdoor recreation needs of an expanding population with an increasing amount of leisure time, in order to promote the enjoyment and appreciation of the outdoor areas of Georgia, and in order to provide for a healthful alternative to motorized travel, trails should be established in urban, suburban, rural, and wilderness areas of Georgia. Therefore, the purpose of this article is to provide for a Georgia Scenic Trails System.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 2.)

12-3-112. "System" defined.

As used in this article, the term "system" means the Georgia Scenic Trails System provided for in this article.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 799, § 1.)

12-3-113. Duties and powers of department as to system; requirements as to title to land traversed by system.

The Department of Natural Resources shall have the responsibility of creating a Georgia Scenic Trails System. In carrying out such responsibilities, it shall be the duty of the department to identify and plan the system, to acquire or otherwise gain control over or rights to the use of the necessary land for the system, and to construct, manage, and maintain the system. For the purpose of carrying out its primary duties as provided in this article, the department shall be authorized to exercise any powers heretofore provided by law for the department, except for the powers of eminent domain. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute concerning the improvement of land held in fee simple by the State of Georgia, the department shall be authorized to expend state funds for construction, maintenance, and management of trails on lands acquired through purchase, easement, lease, or donation; provided, however, that no buildings shall be constructed on any real estate to which the State of Georgia does not hold title in fee simple, unless it is held under a quitclaim deed with a reversionary interest in the federal government or under a long-term federal license agreement with a reversionary interest in the federal government.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1511; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1260, § 1.)

12-3-114. Policies to guide department in creating and administering system.

The department shall be guided by the following policies in creating and administering the Georgia Scenic Trails System:

A balanced system of trails throughout the state should be sought, including, but not limited to, the following types of trails:

Urban trails. These would be located within or close to urban centers and would accommodate intensive use from urban residents. Activities would include jogging, walking, and touring historic sites and other points of interest;

Bicycle trails. These would be located in urban, suburban, or rural areas and should be easily accessible to population centers. Bicycle trails in urban areas should provide an acceptable alternative to certain motorized transportation, and the cyclist should be protected from motorized traffic capable of traveling over 20 miles per hour;

Horse trails. These may extend through urban, suburban, rural, or wilderness areas and should be accessible to population centers. Supporting facilities may include stables, corrals, drinking water, primitive campsites, and shelter;

Rural hiking trails. These would be accessible to, but not within, population centers and may traverse areas of historic or scenic interest, pastureland, and woodland. Activities would include hiking, walking, jogging, touring, camping, and fishing. Support facilities may include simple toilet facilities, drinking water, primitive campsites, and picnic tables and benches;

Primitive hiking trails. These would be primarily to provide the beauty and inspiration of the wilderness experience to an increasingly urban society. They may traverse small areas of pastoral land or roadway but would be largely in undisturbed wilderness areas. Any facilities should be primitive in nature and widely separated;

Historical trails. These would emphasize important events in the history of Georgia and would be appropriately marked to allow the user to become familiar with such history;

Bikeways. These would be publicly owned and maintained paved paths, ways, or trails designated and signed as bicycle and electric assisted bicycle routes and located in urban, suburban, or rural areas. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the routes of such bikeways shall be determined by the local governing authority wherein such bikeways would be located and shall be approved by the Department of Transportation. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "electric assisted bicycle" shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 40-1-1; and

Combination trails. These would be trails consisting of combinations of any of the types of trails described in subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this paragraph;

The use of the trails should be limited to those activities for which intended, and appropriate steps should be taken to enforce this policy;

The physical facilities provided for the trails, such as trail markers, signs, toilet facilities, shelters, drinking water, campsites, picnic tables, and parking areas, should be in keeping with the intended use of the trails and with health, sanitation, and safety requirements but should make minimum changes in the natural environment consistent with those objectives;

Assistance and encouragement should be provided for local governments in the development of trails, and a procedure should be adopted whereby such trails could be regulated and maintained as a part of the system;

The advice, cooperation, and assistance of other state agencies, local governments and agencies thereof, and private associations and organizations should be sought in developing and maintaining the system;

Planning and developing the system should be coordinated with the regional commissions and the Department of Community Affairs;

Trails should be planned, constructed, and maintained on a long-term basis, and in connection therewith long-term control of the land making up the trails should be established by the acquisition in fee simple of rights of way to such land or by leases, easements, or other appropriate long-term agreements; and where feasible, rights of way should be of sufficient width to preserve the recreational, scenic, or historical uniqueness of the trail; and

A program for the education of the public on the effective use and care of trails should be established.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 799, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 19/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2019, p. 264, § 1/HB 454; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 12/SB 429.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subparagraph (1)(B), in the second sentence, inserted "certain" in the middle, and added "capable of traveling over 20 miles per hour" at the end; and, in subparagraph (1)(G), inserted "and electric assisted bicycle" in the middle of the first sentence, and added the third sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added "and" at the end of subparagraph (1)(G).

Cross references.

- Operating requirements for bicycles,

§

40-6-290

et seq.

12-3-115. Construction of bicycle trails and bikeways by Department of Transportation.

The Department of Transportation is authorized and directed to construct bicycle trails and bikeways in this state after the routes of such trails and bikeways have been determined by the Department of Natural Resources or by local governing authorities and approved by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this article.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be deemed or construed to prevent local governing authorities or private associations and organizations from constructing bicycle trails in this state, provided that the power of eminent domain shall not be exercised for the acquisition or construction of such trails.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 470, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 799, § 3.)

Cross references.

- Operating requirements for bicycles,

§

40-6-290

et seq.

12-3-116. Responsibility and liability of owners of premises traversed by system.

Any person who goes upon or through the premises, including, but not limited to, lands, waters, and private ways, of another with or without permission to hunt, fish, swim, trap, camp, hike, sightsee, or for any other purpose, without the payment of monetary consideration, or with the payment of monetary consideration directly or indirectly on his behalf by an agency of the state or federal government, is not thereby entitled to any assurance that the premises are safe for such purpose. The owner of such premises does not assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or failure to act of other persons using such premises.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as affecting the existing case law of Georgia regarding liability of owners or possessors of premises with respect to business invitees in commercial establishments or to invited guests, nor shall this Code section be construed so as to affect the attractive nuisance doctrine. In addition, nothing in this Code section shall excuse the owner or occupant of premises from liability for injury to persons or property caused by the malicious or illegal acts of the owner or occupant.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 6.)

12-3-117. Adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations by Board of Natural Resources.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this article.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 142, § 7.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites system, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1.